Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1438.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin WEST CENTRAL REGIONAL WATER SYSTEM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $9,700,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Public Facilities Authority for a grant to Norman County, Clay County, Polk County, all three counties, or any combination of two of the three counties, to acquire land or interests in land, and to predesign, design, engineer, and construct facilities and infrastructure necessary to complete Phase 1 of the West Central Regional Water System project, including a trunk transmission pipeline and associated water infrastructure to transport potable water to cities in Norman County, Clay County, Polk County, all three counties, or any combination of two of the counties. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $9,700,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end